Hawaii statutes.
[§367-2.3] Compensation. The members
shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for their necessary
expenses in attending meetings of the commission and in the discharge of their
duties. [L 1991, c 46, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next